Arkansas, session 2025, SB574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 234, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-234-123. Service to county property within the boundaries of a
municipality required.
(a) A municipality that owns or operates a waterworks system shall
provide services to any property owned by the county located within the
boundaries of the municipality at the request of the county judge.
(b) The county shall provide payment for:
(1) Costs associated with the connection to the waterworks
system operated by the municipality for the property owned by the county; and
(2) Services at the rates charged to other customers of the
waterworks system.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 235, Subchapter 2, is
*SSS253*
04-03-2025 16:46:00 SSS253

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB574
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-235-227. Service to county property within the boundaries of a
municipality required.
(a) A municipality that owns or operates a sewage collection system or
a sewage treatment plant under this subchapter shall provide services to any
property owned by the county located within the boundaries of the
municipality at the request of the county judge.
(b) The county shall provide payment for:
(1) Costs associated with the connection to the sewage
collection system or sewage treatment plant operated by the municipality for
the property owned by the county; and
(2) Services at the rates charged to other customers of the
sewage collection system.

/s/J. Petty





















04-03-2025 16:46:00 SSS253